Maryland, session 2026, SB0175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection,
from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring
systems, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement
monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems, after the costs of implementing and administering the systems are recovered in
accordance with subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total
revenues of the political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit
any funds that exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.
(VIII) FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY THE CITY OF
CUMBERLAND AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEMS PLACED ON INTERSTATE 68 IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–809(B)(1)(VI)10
OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, ANY BALANCE REMAINING AFTER THE
ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE

SENATE BILL 175 3
USED TO FUND PUBLIC SAFETY PROGRAMS, TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENTS, AND
MAINTENANCE WITHIN THE INTERSTATE 68 CORRIDOR IN THE CITY OF
CUMBERLAND.
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means:
(i) A law enforcement agency of a local political subdivision that is
authorized to issue a citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic
laws or regulations;
(ii) For a municipal corporation that does not maintain a police force,
an agency established or designated by the municipal corporation to implement this
subtitle using speed monitoring systems in accordance with this section;
(iii) For speed monitoring systems placed and used on Interstate 83
in Baltimore County or Interstate 695 in Baltimore County, the State Highway
Administration; or
(iv) For speed monitoring systems placed and used on Maryland
Route 200 (Intercounty Connector), the Maryland Transportation Authority.
(3) (i) “Erroneous violation” means a potential violation submitted by a
speed monitoring system contractor for review by an agency that is apparently inaccurate
based on a technical variable that is under the control of the contractor.
(ii) “Erroneous violation” includes a potential violation based on:
1. A recorded image of a registration plate that does not
match the registration plate issued for the motor vehicle in the recorded image;
2. A recorded image that shows a stopped vehicle or no
progression;
3. An incorrectly measured speed for a motor vehicle;
4. A measured speed of a motor vehicle that is below the
threshold speed that would subject the owner to a civil citation under this section;
5. A recorded image that was taken outside of the hours and
days that speed monitoring systems are authorized for use in school zones; and

SENATE BILL 175
6. A recorded image that was taken by a speed monitoring
system with an expired calibration certificate.
(4) “MOTOR VEHICLE” INCLUDES A COMBINATION OF VEHICLES.
(5) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a
lessee of a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. A motor vehicle rental or leasing company; or
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article.
[(5)] (6) “Program administrator” means an employee or a representative
of the local jurisdiction, the State Highway Administration, or the Maryland
Transportation Authority designated by the local jurisdiction, the State Highway
Administration, or the Authority to oversee a contract with a speed monitoring system
contractor.
[(6)] (7) “Reasonable training” means a level of education, instruction,
and practical experience sufficient to ensure competency in the inspection and
interpretation of the recorded images generated by the speed monitoring system.
[(7)] (8) “Recorded image” means an image recorded by a speed
monitoring system:
(i) On:
1. A photograph;
2. A microphotograph;
3. An electronic image;
4. Videotape; or
5. Any other medium; and
(ii) Showing:
1. The rear of a motor vehicle;
2. At least two time–stamped images of the motor vehicle
that include the same stationary object near the motor vehicle; and

SENATE BILL 175 5
3. On at least one image or portion of tape, a clear and legible
identification of the entire registration plate number of the motor vehicle.
[(8)] (9) “School zone” means a designated roadway segment within up to
a half–mile radius of a school for any of grades kindergarten through grade 12 where
school–related activity occurs, including:
(i) Travel by students to or from school on foot or by bicycle; or
(ii) The dropping off or picking up of students by school buses or
other vehicles.
[(9)] (10) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more
motor vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at
least 12 miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
[(10)] (11) “Speed monitoring system operator” means a representative of
an agency or contractor that operates a speed monitoring system.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used by a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(v) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of a
local jurisdiction under this paragraph shall provide that, if the local jurisdiction moves or
places a mobile or stationary speed monitoring system to or at a location where a speed
monitoring system had not previously been moved or placed, the local jurisdiction may not
issue a citation for a violation recorded by that speed monitoring system:
1. Until signage is installed in accordance with
subparagraph (viii) of this paragraph; and
2. For at least the first 15 calendar days after the signage is
installed.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;

SENATE BILL 175
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line;
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
7. Subject to subparagraph (vii)4 of this paragraph, by the
State Highway Administration on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or on Interstate 695
in Baltimore County;
8. By the Maryland Transportation Authority on Maryland
Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery County; [or]
9. Subject to subparagraph (xii) of this paragraph, in
Montgomery County on a highway identified in the municipality’s, county’s, or State’s most
recent Strategic Highway Safety Plan or Vision Zero Plan as a highway that is at high risk
for motor vehicle crashes that result in serious bodily injury or death; OR
10. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (XIII) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IN THE CITY OF CUMBERLAND ON ANY PORTION OF INTERSTATE 68
FOR WHICH THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT IS 45 MILES PER HOUR.
(XIII) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM PLACED IN THE CITY OF
CUMBERLAND ON INTERSTATE 68 MAY BE USED ONLY TO ENFORCE SPEED LIMITS
FOR CLASS F (TRACTOR) VEHICLES OPERATED IN COMBINATION WITH CLASS G
(TRAILER) FREIGHT TRAILERS OR SEMITRAILERS.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this

SENATE BILL 175 7
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, a civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed:
1. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $40;
2. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $70;
3. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $120;
4. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $230; and
5. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by 40 miles per hour or more, $425.
(ii) A civil penalty under this paragraph for a violation recorded on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695 in Baltimore County may not exceed
$40.
(iii) 1. This paragraph applies to a civil penalty assessed to the
owner or driver of a motor vehicle that is recorded by a speed monitoring system while
being operated on Maryland Route 210 (Piscataway Highway) in Prince George’s County
in violation of this subtitle.
2. The maximum civil penalty under this subparagraph is as
follows:
A. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $40;
B. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $70;
C. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $120;
D. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $230; or
E. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by 40
miles per hour or more, $425.

SENATE BILL 175
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(f) (1) The District Court may consider in defense of a violation:
(i) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, that the motor vehicle
or the registration plates of the motor vehicle were stolen before the violation occurred and
were not under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the violation;
(ii) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, evidence that the
person named in the citation was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation;
[and]
(III) FOR A VIOLATION RECORDED BY A SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM PLACED IN THE CITY OF CUMBERLAND ON INTERSTATE 68, THAT THE
MOTOR VEHICLE WAS NOT A CLASS F (TRACTOR) VEHICLE OPERATED IN
COMBINATION WITH A CLASS G (TRAILER) FREIGHT TRAILER OR SEMITRAILER; AND
[(iii)] (IV) Any other issues and evidence that the District Court
deems pertinent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.